Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 3. Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.
Sec. 33.36.140.
State council.

There is created the State Council for Interstate Adult and Juvenile Offender Supervision to implement the provisions of the compact set out in AS

33.36.110

as the State Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision and the compact set out in AS

47.15.010

as the State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision. The state council shall meet as frequently as necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

The state council consists of nine members as follows:

the commissioner of corrections; the commissioner of corrections may name a designee to serve in this capacity;

the compact administrator appointed under AS

33.36.130

;

an attorney employed in the Department of Law, appointed by the governor;

two members appointed by the governor from among the citizens of the state, at least one of whom must be a representative from victims’ groups;

one ex officio nonvoting member from the legislative branch selected by the legislature and one ex officio nonvoting member from the judicial branch selected by the judiciary;

the commissioner of health and social services; the commissioner of health and social services may name a designee to serve in this capacity;

the compact administrator appointed under AS

47.15.020

.

The commissioner of corrections or the commissioner’s designee shall serve as chair of the state council.

The term of office of a member of the state council appointed under (b)(4) of this section is three years. The members of the state council appointed under (b)(3) and (4) of this section serve at the pleasure of the governor.

Voting members of the state council who are not state employees receive no salary for their work on the council, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for other boards and commissions.

The state council shall

designate the compact administrator, appointed under AS

33.36.130

, as its commissioner to the Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision under the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision set out in AS

33.36.110

; if the compact administrator is unavailable to serve as commissioner at a meeting of the Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision, the council shall designate another person to serve in place of the compact administrator;

exercise oversight and advocacy concerning the state’s participation in the Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision;

subject to available appropriations and other legal obligations, recommend policy development concerning the operations and procedures of the compact within the state; and

make recommendations to the legislature to facilitate the implementation of the compact and the rules and bylaws adopted by the Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision.

History.

(§ 3 ch 61 SLA 2002; am §§ 1, 2 ch 37 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (a), added “and Juvenile” following “Interstate Adult”, and added “as the State Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision and the compact set out in AS

47.15.010

as the State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision” at the end of the first sentence; in (b), substituted “nine” for “seven” in the introductory language, added (b)(6) and (b)(7), and made a related stylistic change.

Sec. 33.36.145.
Application fee.

A person under probation or parole supervision by the Department of Corrections who applies for a transfer of supervision to another state under the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision shall pay to the Department of Corrections a nonrefundable application fee of $100.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 2004)